Wisconsin, session 2025, AB671.
do enact as follows:AB671,13Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.AB671,2,64(1) Study on housing law redundancies. The department of 5administration shall conduct a study of redundancies among federal, state, and 1local requirements for the construction of new housing, including one-family and 2two-family dwellings and multifamily housing. No later than one year after the 3effective date of this subsection, the department shall complete the study and 4submit a report to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature, in the 5manner provided under s. 13.172 (3), regarding the results of the study and 6legislative recommendations for remedying redundancies.AB671,2,77